New York, session 2025-2026, A10194.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 349-dd of the highway law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (j-15) to read as follows: 3 (j-15) Harriet Tubman Underground Railroad scenic byway which shall 4 consist of the portion of the highway system beginning on state route 5 five at the city limits of Auburn, Cayuga county, to its intersection 6 with state route thirty-eight then continuing northerly on state route 7 thirty-eight to the city limits of Auburn; and also all that portion of 8 the highway system beginning on state route five at the Seneca county 9 line in the town of Tyre, continuing westerly on state route five to its 10 intersection with Lake street in the city of Geneva, Ontario county, 11 continuing westerly on Lake street to its intersection with state route 12 fourteen in the city of Geneva, Ontario county, continuing northerly 13 along state route fourteen to its intersection with state route thirty- 14 one in the town of Lyons, Wayne county, continuing westerly on state 15 route thirty-one until its intersection with Chestnut street south in 16 the city of Rochester, Monroe county, continuing northerly on Chestnut 17 street south to its intersection with Broad street east in the city of 18 Rochester, Monroe county, continuing westerly on Broad street east to 19 its intersection with state route thirty-one in the city of Rochester, 20 Monroe county, continuing westerly on state route thirty-one in the city 21 of Rochester, Monroe county to its intersection with East avenue in the 22 city of Lockport, Niagara county, continuing westerly on East avenue in 23 the city of Lockport, Niagara county to Main street, continuing westerly 24 on Main street in the city of Lockport, Niagara county to its inter- 25 section with West Main street in the city of Lockport, Niagara county, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14315-06-6 A. 10194--A 2 1 continuing on West Main street to its intersection with state route 2 seventy-eight in the city of Lockport, Niagara county, continuing south- 3 erly on state route seventy-eight to its intersection with state route 4 two hundred sixty-three in the town of Amherst, Erie county, continuing 5 southerly along state route two hundred sixty-three to its intersection 6 with United States route sixty-two in the town of Amherst, Erie county, 7 continuing southerly along United States route sixty-two to its inter- 8 section with state route five in the town of Amherst, Erie county, 9 continuing westerly on state route five to its intersection with Michi- 10 gan avenue in the city of Buffalo, Erie county, continuing southerly on 11 Michigan avenue to its intersection with Broadway in the city of 12 Buffalo, Erie county, continuing westerly on Broadway to its inter- 13 section with Lafayette square in the city of Buffalo, Erie county, 14 continuing westerly on Lafayette square to its intersection with Court 15 street in the city of Buffalo, Erie county, continuing westerly on Court 16 street to its intersection with Niagara square in the city of Buffalo, 17 Erie county, continuing northerly on Niagara square to its intersection 18 with state route three hundred eighty-four in the city of Buffalo, Erie 19 county, continuing northerly on state route three hundred eighty-four to 20 its intersection with state route two hundred sixty-five in the city of 21 Niagara Falls, Niagara county, continuing northerly on state route two 22 hundred sixty-five to its intersection with state route three hundred 23 eighty-four in the city of Niagara Falls, Niagara county, continuing 24 westerly on state route three hundred eighty-four to its intersection 25 with Niagara street in the city of Niagara Falls, Niagara county, 26 continuing westerly along Niagara street until its intersection with 27 Third street in the city of Niagara Falls, Niagara county, continuing 28 northerly on Third street until its intersection with Whirlpool street 29 in the city of Niagara Falls, Niagara county, and continuing northerly 30 along Whirlpool street to its intersection with Depot avenue west in the 31 city of Niagara Falls, Niagara county. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.